North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 6. Delegation and Exercise of the General Police Power.
§ 153A-144.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-111, s. 2.6(f), as amended by Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and Session Laws 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

History.

2007-279, s. 2; 2009-553, s. 2; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.6(f), as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

§ 153A-145.
Limitations on regulating cisterns and rain barrels.

No county ordinance may prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the installation and maintenance of cisterns and rain barrel collection systems used to collect water for irrigation purposes. A county may regulate the installation and maintenance of those cisterns and rain barrel collection systems for the purpose of protecting the public health and safety and for the purpose of preventing them from becoming a public nuisance.

History.

2011-394, s. 12(d).

§ 153A-145.1.
Transportation impact mitigation ordinances prohibited.

No county may enact or enforce an ordinance, rule, or regulation that requires an employer to assume financial, legal, or other responsibility for the mitigation of the impact of his or her employees’ commute or transportation to or from the employer’s workplace, which may result in the employer being subject to a fine, fee, or other monetary, legal, or negative consequences.

History.

2013-413, s. 10.1(b).

§ 153A-145.2.
Limitations on regulating soft drink sizes.

No county ordinance may prohibit the sale of soft drinks above a particular size. This section does not prohibit any ordinance regulating the sanitation or other operational aspect of a device for the dispensing of soft drinks. For purposes of this section, “soft drink” shall have the meaning set forth in

G.S. 105-164.3

.

History.

2013-309, s. 3.

§ 153A-145.3.
Counties enforce ordinances within public trust areas.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 113-131

or any other provision of law, a county may, by ordinance, define, prohibit, regulate, or abate acts, omissions, or conditions upon the State’s ocean beaches and prevent or abate any unreasonable restriction of the public’s rights to use the State’s ocean beaches. In addition, a county may, in the interest of promoting the health, safety, and welfare of the public, regulate, restrict, or prohibit the placement, maintenance, location, or use of equipment, personal property, or debris upon the State’s ocean beaches. A county may enforce any ordinance adopted pursuant to this section or any other provision of law upon the State’s ocean beaches located within the county’s jurisdictional boundaries to the same extent that a county may enforce ordinances within the county’s jurisdictional boundaries. A county may enforce an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section by any remedy provided for in

G.S. 153A-123

. For purposes of this section, the term “ocean beaches” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 77-20(e)

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to (i) limit the authority of the State or any State agency to regulate the State’s ocean beaches as authorized by

G.S. 113-131

, or common law as interpreted and applied by the courts of this State; (ii) limit any other authority granted to counties by the State to regulate the State’s ocean beaches; (iii) deny the existence of the authority recognized in this section prior to the date this section becomes effective; (iv) impair the right of the people of this State to the customary free use and enjoyment of the State’s ocean beaches, which rights remain reserved to the people of this State as provided in

G.S. 77-20(d)

; (v) change or modify the riparian, littoral, or other ownership rights of owners of property bounded by the Atlantic Ocean; or (vi) apply to the removal of permanent residential or commercial structures and appurtenances thereto from the State’s ocean beaches.

History.

2015-70, s. 1.

§ 6.
Limitations on standards of care for farm animals.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no county ordinance may regulate standards of care for farm animals. For purposes of this section, “standards of care for farm animals” includes the following: the construction, repair, or improvement of farm animal shelter or housing; restrictions on the types of feed or medicines that may be administered to farm animals; and exercise and social interaction requirements. For purposes of this section, the term “farm animals” includes the following domesticated animals: cattle, oxen, bison, sheep, swine, goats, horses, ponies, mules, donkeys, hinnies, llamas, alpacas, lagomorphs, ratites, and poultry.

History.

2015-192, s. 1.

§ 153A-145.5.
Adoption of sanctuary ordinance prohibited.

No county may have in effect any policy, ordinance, or procedure that limits or restricts the enforcement of federal immigration laws to less than the full extent permitted by federal law.

No county shall do any of the following related to information regarding the citizenship or immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any individual:

Prohibit law enforcement officials or agencies from gathering such information.

Direct law enforcement officials or agencies not to gather such information.

Prohibit the communication of such information to federal law enforcement agencies.

History.

2015-294, s. 15(a).

§ 153A-145.6.
Requiring compliance with voluntary State regulations and rules prohibited.

If a State department or agency declares a regulation or rule to be voluntary or the General Assembly delays the effective date of a regulation or rule proposed or adopted by the Environmental Management Commission, or any other board or commission, a county shall not require or enforce compliance with the applicable regulation or rule, including any regulation or rule previously or hereafter incorporated as a condition or contractual obligation imposed by, agreed upon, or accepted by the county in any zoning, land use, subdivision, or other developmental approval, including, without limitation, a development permit issuance, development agreement, site-specific development plan, or phased development plan.

This section shall apply to the following regulations and rules:

Those currently in effect.

Those repealed or otherwise expired.

Those temporarily or permanently held in abeyance.

Those adopted but not yet effective.

This section shall not apply to any water usage restrictions during either extreme or exceptional drought conditions as determined by the Drought Management Advisory Council pursuant to

G.S. 143-355.1

.

History.

2015-246, s. 2(a).

§ 153A-145.7.
Hours of certain alcohol sales.

In accordance with G.S. 18B-1004(c), a county may adopt an ordinance allowing for the sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, fortified wine, and mixed beverages beginning at 10:00 A.M. on Sunday pursuant to the licensed premises’ permit issued under

G.S. 18B-1001

.

History.

2017-87, s. 4(b).

§ 153A-145.8.
Limitations on regulation of catering by bona fide farms.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no county may require a business located on a property used for bona fide farm purposes, as provided in G.S. 160D-903(a), that provides on- and off-site catering services, to obtain a permit to provide catering services within the county. This section shall not be construed to exempt the business from any health and safety rules adopted by a local health department, the Department of Health and Human Services, or the Commission for Public Health.

History.

2020-18, s. 5(c); 2020-74, s. 21(a).

§ 153A-145.9.
Authorization of social district.

A county may adopt an ordinance designating a social district for use in accordance with

G.S. 18B-904.1

.

History.

2021-150, s. 20.1.

§ 153A-145.10.
Authorization of expanded area for ABC licensed premises.

In accordance with G.S. 18B-904(h), a county may adopt an ordinance authorizing permittees holding a permit under Article 10 or 11 of Chapter 18B of the General Statutes to utilize an area that is not part of the permittee’s licensed premises for the outdoor possession and consumption of alcoholic beverages sold by the permittee.

History.

2021-150, s. 21.1.